Tennessee, session 114, HB1662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-1003, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) A person commits aggravated burglary who:
(1) Commits burglary, as described in § 39-13-1002, of a habitation; or
(2) Commits an aggravated criminal trespass in a habitation, as
described in § 39-14-406, and during commission of the aggravated criminal
trespass encounters the property owner using or displaying a firearm in self-
defense, pursuant to § 39-11-611.
(b) Aggravated burglary is a Class C felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-405, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g) and substituting:
(g) Criminal trespass is a Class C felony.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-406, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) A person commits aggravated criminal trespass who enters or remains on
property when the person knows the person does not have the property owner's
effective consent to do so, and:
(1) The person intends, knows, or is reckless about whether such
person's presence will cause fear for the safety of another;
HB1662
011358
- 1 -

(2) The person, in order to gain entry to the property, destroys, cuts,
vandalizes, alters, or removes a gate, signage, fencing, lock, chain, or other
barrier designed to keep trespassers from entering the property; or
(3) The person, while on the property, recklessly damages the property
or personal property thereon.
(b) For purposes of this section, "enter" means intrusion of the entire body.
(c) Aggravated criminal trespass is a Class C felony.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-407(a), is amended by
deleting "Class C misdemeanor" and substituting "Class C felony".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts occurring on or after July 1, 2026.
- 2 - 011358